Ohio, session 136, HB712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 311.30, 505.541, 509.04, 3501.29, 3781.111, 4503.038, 4503.10, 4503.12, 4503.41, 4503.44, 4511.69, 4517.12, 4521.01, 4521.02, 4731.481, and 4734.161 be amended and sections 4503.441, 4503.442, 4503.443, 4503.444, 4503.445, 4503.446, 4503.447, 4503.448, 4511.691, 4511.692, 4511.693, 4511.694, 4511.695, 4511.696, 4511.697, 4511.698, and 4511.699 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 311.30. (A) The board of county commissioners may establish, by resolution, a parking enforcement unit within the office of the sheriff to operate in the unincorporated areas of the county, and may provide for the regulation of parking enforcement officers. The sheriff shall be the executive head of the parking enforcement unit, shall make all appointments and removals of parking enforcement officers, subject to any general rules prescribed by the board of county commissioners by resolution, and shall prescribe rules for the organization, training, administration, control, and conduct of the parking enforcement unit. The sheriff may appoint parking enforcement officers who agree to serve for nominal compensation, and persons with physical disabilities may receive appointments as parking enforcement officers. (B) The authority of the parking enforcement officers shall be limited to the enforcement of section sections 4511.69 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code and any other parking laws specified in the resolution creating the parking enforcement unit. Parking enforcement officers shall have no other powers. (C) The training the parking enforcement officers shall receive shall include instruction in general administrative rules and procedures governing the parking enforcement unit, the role of the judicial system as it relates to parking regulation and enforcement, proper techniques and methods relating to the enforcement of parking laws, human interaction skills, and first aid. Sec. 505.541. (A) The board of township trustees or a joint police district board, respectively, may establish, by resolution, a parking enforcement unit within a township police district or within a joint police district, and provide for the regulation of parking enforcement officers. The chief of police of the district shall be the executive head of the parking enforcement unit, shall make all appointments and removals of parking enforcement officers, subject to any general rules prescribed by the board of township trustees by resolution or joint police district board, as appropriate, and shall prescribe rules for the organization, training, administration, control, and conduct of the parking enforcement unit. The chief of police may appoint parking enforcement officers who agree to serve for nominal compensation, and persons with physical disabilities may receive appointments as parking enforcement officers. (B) The authority of the parking enforcement officers shall be limited to the enforcement of section sections 4511.69 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code and any other parking laws specified in the resolution creating the parking enforcement unit. Parking enforcement officers shall have no other powers. (C) The training the parking enforcement officers shall receive shall include instruction in general administrative rules and procedures governing the parking enforcement unit, the role of the judicial system as it relates to parking regulation and enforcement, proper techniques and methods relating to the enforcement of parking laws, human interaction skills, and first aid. Sec. 509.04. (A) The board of township trustees may establish, by resolution, a parking enforcement unit within the office of a township constable, and provide for the regulation of parking enforcement officers. The board of township trustees shall appoint a police constable as executive head of the parking enforcement unit, who shall make all appointments and removals of parking enforcement officers, subject to any general rules prescribed by the board of township trustees by resolution, and shall prescribe rules for the organization, training, administration, control, and conduct of the parking enforcement unit. The executive head of the parking enforcement unit may appoint parking enforcement officers who agree to serve for nominal compensation, and persons with physical disabilities may receive appointments as parking enforcement officers. (B) The authority of the parking enforcement officers shall be limited to the enforcement of section sections 4511.69 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code and any other parking laws specified in the resolution creating the parking enforcement unit. Parking enforcement officers shall have no other powers. (C) The training the parking enforcement officers shall receive shall include instruction in general administrative rules and procedures governing the parking enforcement unit, the role of the judicial system as it relates to parking regulation and enforcement, proper techniques and medthods methods relating to the enforcement of parking laws, human interaction skills, and first aid. Sec. 3501.29. (A) The board of elections shall provide for each precinct a polling place and provide adequate facilities at each polling place for conducting the election. The board shall provide a sufficient number of screened or curtained voting compartments to which electors may retire and conveniently mark their ballots, protected from the observation of others. Each voting compartment shall be provided at all times with writing implements, instructions how to vote, and other necessary conveniences for marking the ballot. The voting location manager shall ensure that the voting compartments at all times are adequately lighted and contain the necessary supplies. The board shall utilize, in so far as practicable, rooms in public schools and other public buildings for polling places. Upon application of the board of elections, the authority which has the control of any building or grounds supported by taxation under the laws of this state, shall make available the necessary space therein for the purpose of holding elections and adequate space for the storage of voting machines, without charge for the use thereof. A reasonable sum may be paid for necessary janitorial service. When polling places are established in private buildings, the board may pay a reasonable rental therefor, and also the cost of liability insurance covering the premises when used for election purposes, or the board may purchase a single liability policy covering the board and the owners of the premises when used for election purposes. When removable buildings are supplied by the board, they shall be constructed under the contract let to the lowest and best bidder, and the board shall observe all ordinances and regulations then in force as to safety. The board shall remove all such buildings from streets and other public places within thirty days after an election, unless another election is to be held within ninety days. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board shall ensure all of the following: (a) That polling places are free of barriers that would impede ingress and egress of persons with disabilities; (b) That the minimum number of accessible parking locations for persons with mobility disabilities are designated at each polling place in accordance with 28 C.F.R. Part 36, Appendix A, and in compliance with division (E) of section 4511.69 4511.691 of the Revised Code; (c) That the entrances of polling places are level or are provided with a nonskid ramp that meets the requirements of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 104 Stat. 327, 42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq.; (d) That doors are a minimum of thirty-two inches wide. (2) Notwithstanding division (B)(1)(a), (c), or (d) of this section, certain polling places may be specifically exempted by the secretary of state upon certification by a board of elections that a good faith, but unsuccessful, effort has been made to modify, or change the location of, such polling places. (C) The board of elections shall permit any elector with a disability who travels to that elector's polling place, but who is physically unable to enter the polling place, to vote, with the assistance of two polling place officials of major political parties, in the vehicle that conveyed that elector to the polling place, or to receive and cast that elector's ballot at the door of the polling place. Under no other circumstance may an elector vote in a vehicle or at the door of a polling place. (D) The secretary of state shall: (1) Work with other state agencies to facilitate the distribution of information and technical assistance to boards of elections to meet the requirements of division (B) of this section; (2) Work with organizations that represent or provide services to citizens who are elderly or who have disabilities to effect a wide dissemination of information about the availability of absentee voting, voting in the voter's vehicle or at the door of the polling place, or other election services to citizens who are elderly or who have disabilities. (E) Before the day of an election, the director of the board of elections of each county shall sign a statement verifying that each polling place that will be used in that county at that election meets the requirements of division (B)(1)(b) of this section. The signed statement shall be sent to the secretary of state by certified mail or electronically. Sec. 3781.111. (A) In addition to the powers conferred by any other section of the Revised Code, the board of building standards shall adopt standards and rules to facilitate the reasonable access and use by all persons with a disability of all buildings and the facilities of buildings for which plans are submitted for approval under section 3791.04 of the Revised Code. No standard or rule shall be applied to any building the plans or drawings, specifications, and date of which have been approved prior to the time that the standard or rule takes effect. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the standards and rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 104 Stat. 327, 42 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. 12101, as amended,et seq. and the "Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988," 102 Stat. 1619, 42 U.S.C.A. U.S.C. 3601, as amendedet seq. (2) For purposes of enforcement by the Ohio civil rights commission only, approval of a plan as required under section 3791.04 of the Revised Code creates a rebuttable presumption that the plans, drawings, specifications, or data submitted are in compliance with the rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section as they relate to accessibility. (C) All signs posted to designate accessible parking locations for persons with a disability and persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk in accordance with division (E) of section 4511.69 4511.691 of the Revised Code and the standards and rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be mounted on a fixed or movable post or otherwise affixed in a vertical position so that the distance from the ground to the bottom edge of the sign measures not less than five feet. If a new sign or a replacement sign designating an accessible parking location is posted on or after October 14, 1999, there also shall be affixed upon the surface of that sign or affixed next to the designating sign a notice that states the fine applicable for the offense of parking a motor vehicle in the designated accessible parking location if the motor vehicle is not legally entitled to be parked in that location. (D) As used in this section, "disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. As used in division (C) of this section, "persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk" has the same meaning as in division (A)(1) (A) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. (E) No owner of a building or facility where accessible parking locations for persons with a disability must be designated in accordance with the standards and rules adopted pursuant to this section shall fail to properly mark the accessible parking locations as required by those standards and rules or fail to maintain the markings of the accessible parking locations, including the erection and maintenance of the fixed or movable signs. (F) The board annually shall provide statewide training on the rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section as they relate to accessibility for nonresidential building department personnel certified by the board who approve, review plans, and inspect nonresidential construction. Sec. 4503.038. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles shall establish a service fee that applies for purposes of sections 4503.03, 4503.036, 4503.042, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.182, 4503.24, 4503.444503.441, 4503.442, 4503.65, 4505.061, 4506.08, 4507.24, 4507.50, 4507.52, 4509.05, 4519.03, 4519.05, 4519.10, 4519.56, and 4519.69 of the Revised Code. The service fee shall be eight dollars. (B) The registrar shall establish prorated service fees that apply for purposes of multi-year registrations authorized under section 4503.103 of the Revised Code. (C) When a service fee is collected by the registrar, the following portion of the service fee that is not allocated to a deputy registrar but instead is deposited into the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code shall be used exclusively for the state highway patrol for the enforcement of the motor vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio: (1) The three-dollar increase in the service fee under division (A) of this section that is effective on and after the date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025; (2) Any increase in the service fee under division (B) of this section that is effective on and after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025. Sec. 4503.10. (A) The owner of every snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle required to be registered under section 4519.02 of the Revised Code shall file an application for registration under section 4519.03 of the Revised Code. The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, or all-purpose vehicle, that is not designed and constructed by the manufacturer for operation on a street or highway may not register it under this chapter except upon certification of inspection pursuant to section 4513.02 of the Revised Code by the sheriff, or the chief of police of the municipal corporation or township, with jurisdiction over the political subdivision in which the owner of the motor vehicle resides. Except as provided in sections 4503.103 and 4503.107 of the Revised Code, every owner of every other motor vehicle not previously described in this section and every person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title of a motor vehicle that is operated or driven upon the public roads or highways shall cause to be filed each year, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar, a written or electronic application or a preprinted registration renewal notice issued under section 4503.102 of the Revised Code, the form of which shall be prescribed by the registrar, for registration for the following registration year, which shall begin on the first day of January of every calendar year and end on the thirty-first day of December in the same year. Applications for registration and registration renewal notices shall be filed at the times established by the registrar pursuant to section 4503.101 of the Revised Code. A motor vehicle owner also may elect to apply for or renew a motor vehicle registration by electronic means using electronic signature in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, applications for registration shall be made on blanks furnished by the registrar for that purpose, containing the following information: (1) A brief description of the motor vehicle to be registered, including the year, make, model, and vehicle identification number, and, in the case of commercial cars, the gross weight of the vehicle fully equipped computed in the manner prescribed in section 4503.08 of the Revised Code; (2) The name and residence address of the owner, and the township and municipal corporation in which the owner resides; (3) The district of registration, which shall be determined as follows: (a) In case the motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business or branch business, conducted at a particular place, the district of registration is the municipal corporation in which that place is located or, if not located in any municipal corporation, the county and township in which that place is located. (b) In case the vehicle is not so used, the district of registration is the municipal corporation or county in which the owner resides at the time of making the application. (4) Whether the motor vehicle is a new or used motor vehicle; (5) The date of purchase of the motor vehicle; (6) Whether the fees required to be paid for the registration or transfer of the motor vehicle, during the preceding registration year and during the preceding period of the current registration year, have been paid. Each application for registration shall be signed by the owner, either manually or by electronic signature, or pursuant to obtaining a limited power of attorney authorized by the registrar for registration, or other document authorizing such signature. If the owner elects to apply for or renew the motor vehicle registration with the registrar by electronic means, the owner's manual signature is not required. (7) The owner's social security number, driver's license number, or state identification number, or, where a motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business, the owner's federal taxpayer identification number. The bureau of motor vehicles shall retain in its records all social security numbers provided under this section, but the bureau shall not place social security numbers on motor vehicle certificates of registration. (8) Whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make an anatomical gift if an applicant has not so certified under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code. The applicant's response shall not be considered in the decision of whether to approve the application for registration. (B)(1) When an applicant first registers a motor vehicle in the applicant's name, the applicant shall provide proof of ownership of that motor vehicle. Proof of ownership may include any of the following: (a) The applicant may present for inspection a physical certificate of title or memorandum certificate showing title to the motor vehicle to be registered in the name of the applicant. (b) The applicant may present for inspection an electronic certificate of title for the applicant's motor vehicle in a manner prescribed by rules adopted by the registrar. (c) The registrar or deputy registrar may electronically confirm the applicant's ownership of the motor vehicle. An applicant is not required to present a certificate of title to an electronic motor vehicle dealer acting as a limited authority deputy registrar in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. (2) When a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it, each application for registration for a vehicle required to be inspected under that section and those rules shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle issued in accordance with that section. (3) An application for registration shall be refused if any of the following applies: (a) The application is not in proper form. (b) The application is prohibited from being accepted by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. (c) Proof of ownership is required but is not presented or confirmed in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section. (d) All registration and transfer fees for the motor vehicle, for the preceding year or the preceding period of the current registration year, have not been paid. (e) The owner or lessee does not have an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, and rules adopted under it, if that section is applicable. (4) This section does not require the payment of license or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was not taxable for that preceding year or period under sections 4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, and 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. (5) When a certificate of registration is issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner, the official issuing the certificate shall indicate the issuance with a stamp on the certificate of title or memorandum certificate or, in the case of an electronic certificate of title or electronic verification of ownership, an electronic stamp or other notation as specified in rules adopted by the registrar, and with a stamp on the inspection certificate for the motor vehicle, if any. (6) The official also shall indicate, by a stamp or by other means the registrar prescribes, on the registration certificate issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown in the odometer statement included in or attached to the certificate of title. Upon each subsequent registration of the motor vehicle by or on behalf of the same owner, the official also shall so indicate the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown on the immediately preceding certificate of registration. (7) The registrar shall include in the permanent registration record of any vehicle required to be inspected under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the inspection certificate number from the inspection certificate or the alternative emissions certificate number from the alternative emissions certificate that is presented at the time of registration of the vehicle as required under this division. (C)(1) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect the following additional fees for each application for registration and registration renewal received: (a) Except as provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, a fee of eleven dollars on or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of sixteen dollars on and after January 1, 2026; (b) For vehicles specified in divisions (A)(1) to (21) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code, a fee of thirty dollars on or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of thirty-five dollars on and after January 1, 2026. No additional fee shall be charged for vehicles registered under section 4503.65 of the Revised Code. Each additional fee is for the purpose of defraying the department of public safety's costs associated with the administration and enforcement of the motor vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio. Each deputy registrar shall transmit the fees collected under divisions (C)(1) and (3) of this section in the time and manner provided in this section. The registrar shall deposit all moneys received under division (C)(1) of this section into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition, a charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each reflectorized safety license plate issued, and a single charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each county identification sticker or each set of county identification stickers issued, as the case may be, to cover the cost of producing the license plates and stickers, including material, manufacturing, and administrative costs. Those fees shall be in addition to the license tax. If the total cost of producing the plates is less than twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers is less than twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, any excess moneys accruing from the fees shall be distributed in the same manner as provided by section 4501.04 of the Revised Code for the distribution of license tax moneys. If the total cost of producing the plates exceeds twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers exceeds twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, the difference shall be paid from the license tax moneys collected pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised Code. (3) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect the following additional fee, as applicable, for each application for registration or registration renewal received for any hybrid motor vehicle, plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle, or battery electric motor vehicle: (a) One hundred dollars for a hybrid motor vehicle; (b) One hundred fifty dollars for a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle; (c) Two hundred dollars for a battery electric motor vehicle. Each fee imposed under this division shall be prorated based on the number of months for which the vehicle is registered. The registrar shall transmit all money arising from each fee to the treasurer of state for distribution in accordance with division (E) of section 5735.051 of the Revised Code, subject to division (D) of section 5735.05 of the Revised Code. (D) Each deputy registrar shall be allowed a fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application for registration and registration renewal notice the deputy registrar receives, which shall be for the purpose of compensating the deputy registrar for the deputy registrar's services, and such office and rental expenses, as may be necessary for the proper discharge of the deputy registrar's duties in the receiving of applications and renewal notices and the issuing of registrations. (E) Upon the certification of the registrar, the county sheriff or local police officials shall recover license plates erroneously or fraudulently issued. (F) Each deputy registrar, upon receipt of any application for registration or registration renewal notice, together with the license fee and any local motor vehicle license tax levied pursuant to Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, shall transmit that fee and tax, if any, in the manner provided in this section, together with the original and duplicate copy of the application, to the registrar. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director of public safety, may deposit the funds collected by those deputies in a local bank or depository to the credit of the "state of Ohio, bureau of motor vehicles." Where a local bank or depository has been designated by the registrar, each deputy registrar shall deposit all moneys collected by the deputy registrar into that bank or depository not more than one business day after their collection and shall make reports to the registrar of the amounts so deposited, together with any other information, some of which may be prescribed by the treasurer of state, as the registrar may require and as prescribed by the registrar by rule. The registrar, within three days after receipt of notification of the deposit of funds by a deputy registrar in a local bank or depository, shall draw on that account in favor of the treasurer of state. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director and the treasurer of state, may make reasonable rules necessary for the prompt transmittal of fees and for safeguarding the interests of the state and of counties, townships, municipal corporations, and transportation improvement districts levying local motor vehicle license taxes. The registrar may pay service charges usually collected by banks and depositories for such service. If deputy registrars are located in communities where banking facilities are not available, they shall transmit the fees forthwith, by money order or otherwise, as the registrar, by rule approved by the director and the treasurer of state, may prescribe. The registrar may pay the usual and customary fees for such service. (G) This section does not prevent any person from making an application for a motor vehicle license directly to the registrar by mail, by electronic means, or in person at any of the registrar's offices, upon payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application. (H) No person shall make a false statement as to the district of registration in an application required by division (A) of this section. Violation of this division is falsification under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and punishable as specified in that section. (I)(1) Where applicable, the requirements of division (B) of this section relating to the presentation of an inspection certificate issued under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it for a motor vehicle, the refusal of a license for failure to present an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate, and the stamping of the inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate by the official issuing the certificate of registration apply to the registration of and issuance of license plates for a motor vehicle under sections 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.14, 4503.15, 4503.16, 4503.171, 4503.172, 4503.19, 4503.40, 4503.41, 4503.42, 4503.43, 4503.444503.441, 4503.46, 4503.47, and 4503.51 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules ensuring that each owner registering a motor vehicle in a county where a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it receives information about the requirements established in that section and those rules and about the need in those counties to present an inspection certificate or an alternative emissions certificate with an application for registration or preregistration. (b) Upon request, the registrar shall provide the director of environmental protection, or any person that has been awarded a contract under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, an on-line computer data link to registration information for all passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars that are subject to that section. The registrar also shall provide to the director of environmental protection a magnetic data tape containing registration information regarding passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars for which a multi-year registration is in effect under section 4503.103 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under it, including, without limitation, the date of issuance of the multi-year registration, the registration deadline established under rules adopted under section 4503.101 of the Revised Code that was applicable in the year in which the multi-year registration was issued, and the registration deadline for renewal of the multi-year registration. (J) Subject to division (K) of this section, application for registration under the international registration plan, as set forth in sections 4503.60 to 4503.66 of the Revised Code, shall be made to the registrar on forms furnished by the registrar. In accordance with international registration plan guidelines and pursuant to rules adopted by the registrar, the forms shall include the following: (1) A uniform mileage schedule; (2) The gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or combined gross vehicle weight of the combination vehicle as declared by the registrant; (3) Any other information the registrar requires by rule. (K) The registrar shall determine the feasibility of implementing an electronic commercial fleet licensing and management program that will enable the owners of commercial tractors, commercial trailers, and commercial semitrailers to conduct electronic transactions by July 1, 2010, or sooner. If the registrar determines that implementing such a program is feasible, the registrar shall adopt new rules under this division or amend existing rules adopted under this division as necessary in order to respond to advances in technology. If international registration plan guidelines and provisions allow member jurisdictions to permit applications for registrations under the international registration plan to be made via the internet, the rules the registrar adopts under this division shall permit such action. Sec. 4503.12. (A) Upon the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle, the registration of the motor vehicle expires, and the original owner immediately shall remove the license plates from the motor vehicle, except that: (1) If a statutory merger or consolidation results in the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle from a constituent corporation to the surviving corporation, or if the incorporation of a proprietorship or partnership results in the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle from the proprietorship or partnership to the corporation, the registration shall be continued upon the filing by the surviving or new corporation, within thirty days of such transfer, of an application for an amended certificate of registration. Upon a proper filing, the registrar of motor vehicles shall issue an amended certificate of registration in the name of the new owner. (2) If the death of the owner of a motor vehicle results in the transfer of ownership of the motor vehicle to the surviving spouse of the owner or if a motor vehicle is owned by two persons under joint ownership with right of survivorship established under section 2131.12 of the Revised Code and one of those persons dies, the registration shall be continued upon the filing by the survivor of an application for an amended certificate of registration. In relation to a motor vehicle that is owned by two persons under joint ownership with right of survivorship established under section 2131.12 of the Revised Code, the application shall be accompanied by a copy of the certificate of title that specifies that the vehicle is owned under joint ownership with right of survivorship. Upon a proper filing, the registrar shall issue an amended certificate of registration in the name of the survivor. (3) If the death of the owner of a motor vehicle results in the transfer of ownership of the motor vehicle to a transfer-on-death beneficiary or beneficiaries designated under section 2131.13 of the Revised Code, the registration shall be continued upon the filing by the transfer-on-death beneficiary or beneficiaries of an application for an amended certificate of registration. The application shall be accompanied by a copy of the certificate of title that specifies that the owner of the motor vehicle has designated the motor vehicle in beneficiary form under section 2131.13 of the Revised Code. Upon a proper filing, the registrar shall issue an amended certificate of registration in the name of the transfer-on-death beneficiary or beneficiaries. (4) If the original owner of a motor vehicle that has been transferred makes application for the registration of another motor vehicle at any time during the remainder of the registration period for which the transferred motor vehicle was registered, the owner may file an application for transfer of the registration and, where applicable, the license plates. The transfer of the registration and, where applicable, the license plates from the motor vehicle for which they originally were issued to a succeeding motor vehicle purchased by the same person in whose name the original registration and license plates were issued shall be done within a period not to exceed thirty days. During that thirty-day period, the license plates from the motor vehicle for which they originally were issued may be displayed on the succeeding motor vehicle, and the succeeding motor vehicle may be operated on the public roads and highways in this state. At the time of application for transfer, the registrar shall compute and collect the amount of tax due on the succeeding motor vehicle, based upon the amount that would be due on a new registration as of the date on which the transfer is made less a credit for the unused portion of the original registration beginning on that date. If the credit exceeds the amount of tax due on the new registration, no refund shall be made. In computing the amount of tax due and credits to be allowed under this division, the provisions of division (B)(1)(a) and (b) of section 4503.11 of the Revised Code shall apply. As to passenger cars, noncommercial vehicles, motor homes, and motorcycles, transfers within or between these classes of motor vehicles only shall be allowed. If the succeeding motor vehicle is of a different class than the motor vehicle for which the registration originally was issued, new license plates also shall be issued upon the surrender of the license plates originally issued and payment of the fees provided in divisions (C) and (D) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code. (5) The owner of a commercial car having a gross vehicle weight or combined gross vehicle weight of more than ten thousand pounds may transfer the registration of that commercial car to another commercial car the owner owns without transferring ownership of the first commercial car. At any time during the remainder of the registration period for which the first commercial car was registered, the owner may file an application for the transfer of the registration and, where applicable, the license plates, accompanied by the certificate of registration of the first commercial car. The amount of any tax due or credit to be allowed for a transfer of registration under this division shall be computed in accordance with division (A)(4) of this section. No commercial car to which a registration is transferred under this division shall be operated on a public road or highway in this state until after the transfer of registration is completed in accordance with this division. (6) Upon application to the registrar or a deputy registrar, a person who owns or leases a motor vehicle may transfer special license plates assigned to that vehicle to any other vehicle that the person owns or leases or that is owned or leased by the person's spouse. As appropriate, the application also shall be accompanied by a power of attorney for the registration of a leased vehicle and a written statement releasing the special plates to the applicant. Upon a proper filing, the registrar or deputy registrar shall assign the special license plates to the motor vehicle owned or leased by the applicant and issue a new certificate of registration for that motor vehicle. (7) If a corporation transfers the ownership of a motor vehicle to an affiliated corporation, the affiliated corporation may apply to the registrar for the transfer of the registration and any license plates. The registrar may require the applicant to submit documentation of the corporate relationship and shall determine whether the application for registration transfer is made in good faith and not for the purposes of circumventing the provisions of this chapter. Upon a proper filing, the registrar shall issue an amended certificate of registration in the name of the new owner. (B) An application under division (A) of this section shall be accompanied by a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code, a transfer fee of one dollar, and the original certificate of registration, if applicable. (C) Neither the registrar nor a deputy registrar shall transfer a registration under division (A) of this section if the registration is prohibited by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. (D) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (E) As used in division (A)(6) of this section, "special license plates" means either of the following: (1) Any license plates for which the person to whom the license plates are issued must pay an additional fee in excess of the fees prescribed in section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, and the service fee prescribed in division (D) or (G) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code; (2) License plates issued under section 4503.44 4503.441 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.41. (A) Any disabled veteran who, because of a service-connected disability, has been or is awarded funds for the purchase of a motor vehicle under the "Disabled Veterans' and Servicemen's Automobile Assistance Act of 1970," 84 Stat. 1998, 38 U.S.C. 1901, and amendments thereto, and any disabled veteran having a service-connected disability either rated or compensated at one hundred per cent by the veterans' administration, may apply to the registrar for the registration of the disabled veteran's personal motor vehicle. Except as provided in division (C) of this section, a disabled veteran is not required to pay any registration fee and service fee as required by sections 4503.038, 4503.04, 4503.10, 4503.102, and 4503.103 of the Revised Code, any local motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, any fee charged under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code, or any fees associated with transferring a registration under section 4503.12 of the Revised Code. The application for registration shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence of disability as the registrar may require by rule. (B) Upon the receipt of an application for registration of a motor vehicle under this section, and presentation of satisfactory evidence of disability, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant a set of accessible license plates, which shall be red, white, and blue in color and shall, in addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed thereon, be inscribed with the word "veteran" and imprinted with the international wheelchair symbol of access. (C) A disabled veteran who is eligible to register a motor vehicle under this section may register as many vehicles as are titled and registered in that disabled veteran's name. For each additional registration after the first registration, the registrar or deputy registrar shall collect any applicable fee imposed in sections 4503.038, 4503.04, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.103, 4503.12, and 4503.19 of the Revised Code, and any local motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.44. (A) As used in this section and in section 4511.69 sections 4503.44 to 4503.448 of the Revised Code: (1)(A) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk" means any person who, as determined by a health care provider, meets any of the following criteria: (a)(1) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest; (b)(2) Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device; (c)(3) Is restricted by a lung disease to such an extent that the person's forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty millimeters of mercury on room air at rest; (d)(4) Uses portable oxygen; (e)(5) Has a cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified in severity as class III or class IV according to standards set by the American heart association; (f)(6) Is severely limited in the ability to walk due to an arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition; (g)(7) Is blind, legally blind, or severely visually impaired. (2)(B) "Organization" means any private organization or corporation, or any governmental board, agency, department, division, or office, that, as part of its business or program, transports persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk on a regular basis in a motor vehicle that has not been altered for the purpose of providing it with accessible equipment for use by persons with disabilities. This definition does not apply to division (I) of this section. (3)(C) "Health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or chiropractor as defined in this section except that an optometrist shall only make determinations as to division (A)(1)(g)(A)(7) of this section. (4)(D) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code. (5)(E) "Chiropractor" means a person licensed to practice chiropractic under Chapter 4734. of the Revised Code. (6)(F) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a certified nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, certified registered nurse anesthetist, or certified nurse-midwife who holds a certificate of authority issued by the board of nursing under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (7)(G) "Physician assistant" means a person who is licensed as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (8)(H) "Optometrist" means a person licensed to engage in the practice of optometry under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code. (9)(I) "Removable windshield placard" means a placard issued to a person or organization under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code and includes a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, unless otherwise specified. (J) "Accessible license plate" means a license plate issued to a person or organization under section 4503.41 or 4503.441 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) An organization, or a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, may apply for the registration of any motor vehicle the organization or person owns or leases. When an adaptive mobility vehicle is owned or leased by someone other than a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, the owner or lessee may apply to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar for registration under this section. The application for registration of a motor vehicle owned or leased by a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk shall be accompanied by a signed statement from the applicant's health care provider certifying that the applicant meets at least one of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) of this section and that the disability is expected to continue for more than six consecutive months. The application for registration of an adaptive mobility vehicle that is owned by someone other than a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence of vehicle specifications or alterations as the registrar may require by rule. (2) When an organization, a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, or a person who does not have a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk but owns a motor vehicle that has been altered for the purpose of providing it with accessible equipment for a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk first submits an application for registration of a motor vehicle under this section and every fifth year thereafter, the organization or person shall submit a signed statement from the applicant's health care provider, a completed application, and any required documentary evidence of vehicle specifications or alterations as provided in division (B)(1) of this section, and also a power of attorney from the owner of the motor vehicle if the applicant leases the vehicle. Upon submission of these items, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant appropriate vehicle registration and a set of license plates and validation stickers, or validation stickers alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed thereon, the license plates shall be imprinted with the international symbol of access. The license plates and validation stickers shall be issued upon payment of the regular license fee as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code and any motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, and the payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk may apply to the registrar for a removable windshield placard by completing and signing an application provided by the registrar. (2) The person shall include with the application a prescription from the person's health care provider prescribing such a placard for the person based upon a determination that the person meets at least one of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) of this section. The health care provider shall state on the prescription the length of time the health care provider expects the applicant to have the disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk. If the length of time the applicant is expected to have the disability is six consecutive months or less, the applicant shall submit an application for a temporary removable windshield placard. If the length of time the applicant is expected to have the disability is permanent, the applicant shall submit an application for a permanent removable windshield placard. All other applicants shall submit an application for a standard removable windshield placard. (3) In addition to one placard or one or more sets of license plates, a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk is entitled to one additional placard, but only if the person applies separately for the additional placard, states the reasons why the additional placard is needed, and the registrar, in the registrar's discretion determines that good and justifiable cause exists to approve the request for the additional placard. (4) An organization may apply to the registrar of motor vehicles for a standard removable windshield placard by completing and signing an application provided by the registrar. The organization shall comply with any procedures the registrar establishes by rule. The organization shall include with the application documentary evidence that the registrar requires by rule showing that the organization regularly transports persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. (5) The registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to an applicant a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, as applicable, upon receipt of all of the following: (a) A completed and signed application for a removable windshield placard; (b) The accompanying documents required under division (C)(2) or (4) of this section; (c) Payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for a standard removable windshield placard or a temporary removable windshield placard, or payment of fifteen dollars for a permanent removable windshield placard. (6) The removable windshield placard shall display the date of expiration on both sides of the placard, or the word "permanent" if the placard is a permanent removable windshield placard, and shall be valid until expired, revoked, or surrendered. Except for a permanent removable windshield placard, which has no expiration, a removable windshield placard expires on the earliest of the following two dates: (a) The date that the person issued the placard is expected to no longer have the disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, as indicated on the prescription submitted with the application for the placard; (b) Ten years after the date of issuance on the placard. In no case shall a removable windshield placard be valid for a period of less than sixty days. (7) Standard removable windshield placards shall be renewable upon application and upon payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall provide the application form and shall determine the information to be included thereon. (8) The registrar shall determine the form and size of each type of the removable windshield placard, the material of which it is to be made, any differences in color between each type of placard to make them readily identifiable, and any other information to be included thereon, and shall adopt rules relating to the issuance, expiration, revocation, surrender, and proper display of such placards. A temporary removable windshield placard shall display the word "temporary" in letters of such size as the registrar shall prescribe. Any placard issued after October 14, 1999, shall be manufactured in a manner that allows the expiration date of the placard to be indicated on it through the punching, drilling, boring, or creation by any other means of holes in the placard. (9) At the time a removable windshield placard is issued to a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, the registrar or deputy registrar shall enter into the records of the bureau of motor vehicles the last date on which the person will have that disability, as indicated on the accompanying prescription. For a standard removable windshield placard, not less than thirty days prior to that date and any renewal dates, the bureau shall send a renewal notice to that person at the person's last known address as shown in the records of the bureau, informing the person that the person's removable windshield placard will expire on the indicated date, and that the person is required to renew the placard by submitting to the registrar or a deputy registrar another prescription, and by complying with the renewal provisions. If such a prescription is not received by the registrar or a deputy registrar by that date, the placard issued to that person expires and no longer is valid, and this fact shall be recorded in the records of the bureau. (10) At least once every year, on a date determined by the registrar, the bureau shall examine the records of the office of vital statistics, located within the department of health, that pertain to deceased persons, and also the bureau's records of all persons who have been issued removable windshield placards. If the records of the office of vital statistics indicate that a person to whom a removable windshield placard has been issued is deceased, the bureau shall cancel that placard, and note the cancellation in its records. The office of vital statistics shall make available to the bureau all information necessary to enable the bureau to comply with division (C)(10) of this section. (11) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person or organization to apply for a removable windshield placard or accessible license plates if the accessible license plates issued to the person or organization under prior law have not expired or been surrendered or revoked. (D) Any active-duty member of the armed forces of the United States, including the reserve components of the armed forces and the national guard, who has an illness or injury that limits or impairs the ability to walk may apply to the registrar or a deputy registrar for a temporary removable windshield placard. With the application, the person shall present evidence of the person's active-duty status and the illness or injury. Evidence of the illness or injury may include a current department of defense convalescent leave statement, any department of defense document indicating that the person currently has an ill or injured casualty status or has limited duties, or a prescription from any health care provider prescribing the placard for the applicant. Upon receipt of the application and the necessary evidence, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue the applicant the temporary removable windshield placard without the payment of any service fee. (E) If an applicant for a removable windshield placard is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States whose disability, as defined in division (A)(1) of this section, is service-connected, the registrar or deputy registrar, upon receipt of the application, presentation of a signed statement from the applicant's health care provider certifying the applicant's disability, and presentation of such documentary evidence from the department of veterans affairs that the disability of the applicant meets at least one of the criteria identified in division (A)(1) of this section and is service-connected as the registrar may require by rule, but without the payment of any service fee, shall issue the applicant a removable windshield placard that is valid until expired, surrendered, or revoked. (F)(1) Upon a conviction of a violation of division (H) or (I) of this section, the court shall report the conviction, and send the placard, if available, to the registrar, who thereupon shall revoke the privilege of using the placard and send notice in writing to the placardholder at that holder's last known address as shown in the records of the bureau, and the placardholder shall return the placard if not previously surrendered to the court, to the registrar within ten days following mailing of the notice. (2) Whenever a person to whom a removable windshield placard has been issued moves to another state, the person shall surrender the placard to the registrar; and whenever an organization to which a placard has been issued changes its place of operation to another state, the organization shall surrender the placard to the registrar. (3) If a person no longer requires a permanent removable windshield placard, the person shall notify and surrender the placard to the registrar or deputy registrar within ten days of no longer requiring the placard. The person may still apply for a standard removable windshield placard or temporary removable windshield placard, if applicable. (G) Subject to division (F) of section 4511.69 of the Revised Code, the operator of a motor vehicle displaying a removable windshield placard or the accessible license plates authorized by this section is entitled to park the motor vehicle in any accessible parking location reserved for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. (H) No person or organization that is not eligible for the issuance of license plates or any placard under this section shall willfully and falsely represent that the person or organization is so eligible. No person or organization shall display license plates issued under this section unless the license plates have been issued for the vehicle on which they are displayed and are valid. (I) No person or organization to which a removable windshield placard is issued shall do either of the following: (1) Display or permit the display of the placard on any motor vehicle when having reasonable cause to believe the motor vehicle is being used in connection with an activity that does not include providing transportation for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk; (2) Refuse to return or surrender the placard, when required. (J) If a removable windshield placard or parking card is lost, destroyed, or mutilated, the placardholder or cardholder may obtain a duplicate by doing both of the following: (1) Furnishing suitable proof of the loss, destruction, or mutilation to the registrar; (2) Paying a service fee equal to the amount paid when the placardholder obtained the original placard. Any placardholder who loses a placard and, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original, immediately shall surrender the original placard to the registrar. (K)(1) The registrar shall pay all fees received under this section for the issuance of removable windshield placards or duplicate removable windshield placards into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition to the fees collected under this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall ask each person applying for a removable windshield placard or duplicate removable windshield placard or license plate issued under this section, whether the person wishes to make a two-dollar voluntary contribution to support rehabilitation employment services. The registrar shall transmit the contributions received under this division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the rehabilitation employment fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. A deputy registrar shall transmit the contributions received under this division to the registrar in the time and manner prescribed by the registrar. The contributions in the fund shall be used by the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency to purchase services related to vocational evaluation, work adjustment, personal adjustment, job placement, job coaching, and community-based assessment from accredited community rehabilitation program facilities. (L) For purposes of enforcing this section, every peace officer is deemed to be an agent of the registrar. Any peace officer or any authorized employee of the bureau of motor vehicles who, in the performance of duties authorized by law, becomes aware of a person whose removable windshield placard or parking card has been revoked pursuant to this section, may confiscate that placard or parking card and return it to the registrar. The registrar shall prescribe any forms used by law enforcement agencies in administering this section. No peace officer, law enforcement agency employing a peace officer, or political subdivision or governmental agency employing a peace officer, and no employee of the bureau is liable in a civil action for damages or loss to persons arising out of the performance of any duty required or authorized by this section. As used in this division, "peace officer" has the same meaning as in division (B) of section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (M) All applications for registration of motor vehicles and removable windshield placards issued under this section, all renewal notices for such items, and all other publications issued by the bureau that relate to this section shall set forth the criminal penalties that may be imposed upon a person who violates any provision relating to accessible license plates issued under this section, the parking of vehicles displaying such license plates, and the issuance, procurement, use, and display of removable windshield placards issued under this section. (N) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Sec. 4503.441. (A) Any of the following owners or lessors of a motor vehicle may apply to register that motor vehicle for purposes of obtaining an accessible license plate under this section: (1) An organization; (2) A person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk; (3) A person who owns or leases an adaptive mobility vehicle. (B)(1) The application for registration of a motor vehicle owned or leased by an organization shall be accompanied by documentary evidence showing that the organization regularly transports persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. (2) The application for registration of a motor vehicle owned or leased by a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk shall be accompanied by an accessible parking certification form from the applicant's health care provider certifying that the applicant meets at least one of the criteria contained in division (A) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code and that the disability is expected to continue for more than six consecutive months. (3) The application for registration of an adaptive mobility vehicle shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence of vehicle alterations as the registrar may require by rule. (4) The application for registration of a leased motor vehicle under this section shall be accompanied by a power of attorney from the owner of the motor vehicle. (5) The supporting documents required by divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section, as applicable, shall be submitted with the initial application for registration of the motor vehicle and every fifth year thereafter. (C) Upon submission of a completed application and any supporting documents required under division (B) of this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and an accessible license plate and validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed on the license plate, the license plate shall be imprinted with the international symbol of access. The license plate and validation sticker shall be issued upon payment of the regular license fee as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, and a service fee equal to the amount specified in section 4503.038 of the Revised Code, and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles. (D) No person or organization that is not eligible for the issuance of an accessible license plate shall knowingly represent that the person or organization is so eligible. Sec. 4503.442. (A)(1) A person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk may apply to the registrar of motor vehicles for a removable windshield placard by completing and signing an application provided by the registrar. (2) The person shall include with the application an accessible parking certification form from the person's health care provider authorizing such a placard for the person. The health care provider shall base the authorization on a determination that the person meets at least one of the criteria contained in division (A) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. The health care provider shall state on the form the length of time the health care provider expects the applicant to have the disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk. If the length of time the applicant is expected to have the disability is six consecutive months or less, the applicant shall submit an application for a temporary removable windshield placard. If the length of time the applicant is expected to have the disability is permanent, the applicant shall submit an application for a permanent removable windshield placard. All other applicants shall submit an application for a standard removable windshield placard. (3) A person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk is entitled to one additional placard, but only if the person applies separately for the additional placard and states the reasons why the additional placard is needed. The registrar shall determine whether good and justifiable cause exists to approve the request for the additional placard. (B) An organization may apply to the registrar for a standard removable windshield placard by completing and signing an application provided by the registrar. The organization shall include with the application documentary evidence showing that the organization regularly transports persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. The organization shall comply with any procedures the registrar establishes by rule. (C) The registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to an applicant a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, as applicable, upon receipt of all of the following: (1) A completed and signed application for a removable windshield placard; (2) The accompanying documents required under either division (A) or (B) of this section; (3) Payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for a standard removable windshield placard or a temporary removable windshield placard, or payment of a fifteen dollar service fee for a permanent removable windshield placard. (D)(1) A removable windshield placard shall display the date of expiration on both sides of the placard, or the word "permanent" if the placard is a permanent removable windshield placard, and is valid until expired, revoked, canceled, or surrendered. Except for a permanent removable windshield placard, which has no expiration, a removable windshield placard expires on the earliest of the following two dates: (a) The date that the person issued the placard is expected to no longer have the disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, as indicated on the accessible parking certification form; (b) Ten years after the date of issuance of the placard. In no case shall a removable windshield placard be valid for a period of less than sixty days. (2) A person or organization shall renew a standard removable windshield placard upon application as provided in division (A) or (B) of this section and upon payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (3) Not less than thirty days prior to the expiration date of a standard removable windshield placard, the bureau of motor vehicles shall send a renewal notice to the person or organization that has been issued the placard. The bureau shall send the notice to the person's or organization's last known address, as shown in the records of the bureau. The notice shall state that the placard is expiring and instructions on how to renew the placard. (4) If a person or organization fails to renew the removable windshield placard issued to that person or organization prior to the expiration date, if applicable, the placard issued to that person or organization expires. (E) At least once every year, on a date determined by the registrar, the bureau shall examine the records of the office of vital statistics, located within the department of health, that pertain to deceased persons, and also the bureau's records of all persons who have been issued removable windshield placards. If the records of the office of vital statistics indicate that a person to whom a removable windshield placard has been issued is deceased, the bureau shall cancel that placard, and note the cancellation in its records. The office of vital statistics shall make available to the bureau all information necessary to enable the bureau to comply with division (E) of this section. (F)(1) The standard removable windshield placard shall be printed in white on a blue-colored background and shall display the international symbol of access, the name of the state, and the great seal of the state. The placard also shall display a distinguishing number assigned to the placard and the printed expiration date of the placard by month, day, and year. (2) The temporary removable windshield placard shall be the same size and form and shall have the same contents as the removable windshield placard, except that it shall be printed in white on a red-colored background and also shall display the word "temporary." (3) The permanent removable windshield placard shall be the same size and form and shall have the same contents as the standard removable windshield placard, except that it shall be printed in white on a blue-colored background and also shall display the word "permanent" instead of an expiration date. (G)(1) Any active-duty member of the armed forces of the United States, including the reserve components of the armed forces and the national guard, who has an illness or injury that limits or impairs the ability to walk may apply to the registrar or a deputy registrar for a temporary removable windshield placard. (2) With the application, the applicant shall present evidence of the person's active-duty status and the illness or injury. Evidence of the illness or injury may include any of the following: (a) A current department of defense convalescent leave statement; (b) Any department of defense document indicating that the applicant currently has an ill or injured casualty status or has limited duties; (c) An accessible parking certification form from any health care provider authorizing the placard for the applicant. (3) Upon receipt of the application and the necessary documentary evidence, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue the applicant the temporary removable windshield placard without requiring the payment of any service fee. (H)(1) An applicant for a removable windshield placard may obtain the placard without payment of a service fee if both of the following apply: (a) The applicant is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a service-connected disability. (b) The applicant submits the accessible parking certification form required under division (A) of this section and documentary evidence from the department of veterans affairs that the disability identified on the form is service-connected. (2) Upon receipt of the application and the necessary documentary evidence, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue the applicant the removable windshield placard without requiring the payment of a service fee. (I) If a removable windshield placard is lost, destroyed, or mutilated, the person or organization issued the placard may obtain a duplicate by furnishing suitable proof of the loss, destruction, or mutilation to the registrar. Any person or organization who loses a placard and, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original, immediately shall surrender the original placard to the registrar. (J) No person or organization that is not eligible for the issuance of a removable windshield placard shall knowingly represent that the person or organization is so eligible. (K) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person or organization to apply for a removable windshield placard if the placard issued to the person or organization under prior law has not expired or been surrendered, revoked, or canceled. (L) The registrar shall pay all fees received under this section for the issuance of removable windshield placards into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (M) The registrar shall adopt any rules necessary to administer this section, including any necessary procedures or required documentary evidence. The rules shall include the creation of a model accessible parking certification form. The registrar shall make the form available on the bureau of motor vehicle's web site. Sec. 4503.443. In addition to the fees collected under sections 4503.441 and 4503.442 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor vehicles or deputy registrar shall ask each person applying for a removable windshield placard, duplicate removable windshield placard, or an accessible license plate, whether the person wishes to make a two-dollar voluntary contribution to support rehabilitation employment services. The registrar shall transmit the contributions received under this section to the treasurer of state for deposit into the rehabilitation employment fund, which is created in the state treasury. A deputy registrar shall transmit the contributions received under this section to the registrar in the time and manner prescribed by the registrar. The opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency shall use the contributions deposited in the fund to purchase from accredited community rehabilitation program facilities services related to vocational evaluation, work adjustment, personal adjustment, job placement, job coaching, and community-based assessment. Sec. 4503.444. (A) The following documents shall include the information listed in division (B) of this section: (1) An application for registration of a motor vehicle under section 4503.441 of the Revised Code; (2) An application for a removable windshield placard under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code; (3) A renewal notice for the items listed in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section; (4) All other publications issued by the bureau of motor vehicles that relate to sections 4503.44 to 4503.448 of the Revised Code. (B) The documents listed in division (A) of this section shall set forth the penalties that may be imposed upon a person who violates any of the following provisions: (1) The laws relating to the issuance, procurement, use, and display of accessible license plates issued under section 4503.441 of the Revised Code; (2) The laws relating to the issuance, procurement, use, and display of removable windshield placards issued under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code; (3) The laws relating to the parking of a motor vehicle displaying an accessible license plate or removable windshield placard in an accessible parking space. Sec. 4503.445. (A) Any person or organization that possesses an accessible license plate or a removable windshield placard shall return the plate or placard to the bureau of motor vehicles if any of the following occur: (1) The plate expires and is not renewed or the placard expires. (2) The plate or placard was issued to a person who is now deceased. (3) The plate or placard was issued to a person who no longer qualifies for or requires the plate or placard. (4) The placard was issued to a person who no longer lives in the state or to an organization that changed its place of operation to another state. (B) No person or organization shall refuse to return or surrender the placard, when required. (C) No person shall operate a motor vehicle that displays an accessible license plate or a removable windshield placard if the plate or placard is expired, canceled, or revoked, was issued to a person who is deceased, or was issued to a person or organization that no longer qualifies for or requires the plate or placard. (D)(1) Whoever violates division (B) or (C) of this section, division (D) of section 4503.441, or division (J) of section 4503.442 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (2) The offenses established under this section are strict liability offenses and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (E) Any fine collected under division (D) of this section shall be paid into the accessible parking violations fund established by section 4511.693 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.446. (A) Subject to section 4511.692 of the Revised Code, the operator of a motor vehicle displaying an accessible license plate or removable windshield placard is entitled to park the motor vehicle in any special parking location reserved for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk, also known as accessible parking spaces or disability parking spaces. (B) No person or organization shall display an accessible license plate unless the license plate was issued for the motor vehicle on which it is displayed and is valid. (C) No person or organization issued a removable windshield placard shall do either of the following: (1) Display or allow the display of the placard on a motor vehicle when the motor vehicle is being used for an activity that does not include providing transportation for a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk; (2) Transfer the placard to any other person or entity. (D)(1) Whoever violates division (B) or (C) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (2) The offenses established under this section are strict liability offenses and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (E) Upon a conviction of a violation of division (B) or (C) of this section, the court shall report the conviction, and send the placard, if available, to the registrar of motor vehicles. The registrar shall revoke the privilege of using the placard and send a written notice to the placardholder at that holder's last known address, as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. The placardholder shall return the placard, if not previously surrendered to the court, to the registrar within ten days following the mailing of the notice. (F) Any fine collected under division (D) of this section shall be paid into the accessible parking violations fund established by section 4511.693 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.447. For purposes of enforcing sections 4503.44 to 4503.447 of the Revised Code, every peace officer is deemed to be an agent of the registrar of motor vehicles. Any peace officer or any authorized employee of the bureau of motor vehicles who, in the performance of duties authorized by law, becomes aware of a person whose removable windshield placard has been revoked, may confiscate that placard and return it to the registrar. The registrar shall prescribe any forms used by law enforcement agencies in administering this section. No peace officer, law enforcement agency employing a peace officer, or political subdivision or governmental agency employing a peace officer, and no employee of the bureau is liable in a civil action for damages or loss to persons arising out of the performance of any duty required or authorized by this section. As used in this section, "peace officer" has the same meaning as in division (B) of section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.448. No health care provider shall do any of the following: (A) Complete the accessible parking certification form to enable a person to be issued an accessible license plate, a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard under either section 4503.441 or 4503.442 of the Revised Code, knowing that the person does not meet any of the criteria contained in division (A) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code; (B) Complete the accessible parking certification form described in division (A) of this section and knowingly misstate on the form the length of time the health care provider expects the person to have the disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk in order to enable the person to retain a removable windshield placard issued under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code for a period of time longer than that which would be estimated by a similar health care provider under the same or similar circumstances; (C) Fail to retain information sufficient to substantiate that the person is eligible for accessible parking privileges. (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (E) A physician who violates this section and section 4731.481 of the Revised Code may be charged under this section or section 4731.481 of the Revised Code, but not both. A chiropractor who violates this section and section 4734.161 of the Revised Code may be charged under this section or section 4734.161 of the Revised Code, but not both. Sec. 4511.69. (A) Every vehicle stopped or parked upon a roadway where there is an adjacent curb shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel with and not more than twelve inches from the right-hand curb, unless it is impossible to approach so close to the curb; in such case the stop shall be made as close to the curb as possible and only for the time necessary to discharge and receive passengers or to load or unload merchandise. Local authorities by ordinance may permit angle parking on any roadway under their jurisdiction, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on a state route within a municipal corporation unless an unoccupied roadway width of not less than twenty-five feet is available for free-moving traffic. (B) Local authorities by ordinance may permit parking of vehicles with the left-hand wheels adjacent to and within twelve inches of the left-hand curb of a one-way roadway. (C)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, no vehicle or trackless trolley shall be stopped or parked on a road or highway with the vehicle or trackless trolley facing in a direction other than the direction of travel on that side of the road or highway. (b) The operator of a motorcycle may back the motorcycle into an angled parking space so that when the motorcycle is parked it is facing in a direction other than the direction of travel on the side of the road or highway. (2) The operator of a motorcycle may back the motorcycle into a parking space that is located on the side of, and parallel to, a road or highway. The motorcycle may face any direction when so parked. Not more than two motorcycles at a time shall be parked in a parking space as described in division (C)(2) of this section irrespective of whether or not the space is metered. (D) Notwithstanding any statute or any rule, resolution, or ordinance adopted by any local authority, air compressors, tractors, trucks, and other equipment, while being used in the construction, reconstruction, installation, repair, or removal of facilities near, on, over, or under a street or highway, may stop, stand, or park where necessary in order to perform such work, provided a flagperson is on duty or warning signs or lights are displayed as may be prescribed by the director of transportation. (E) Accessible parking locations and privileges for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk shall be provided and designated by all political subdivisions and by the state and all agencies and instrumentalities thereof at all offices and facilities, where parking is provided, whether owned, rented, or leased, and at all publicly owned parking garages. The locations shall be designated through the posting of an elevated sign, whether permanently affixed or movable, imprinted with the international symbol of access and shall be reasonably close to exits, entrances, elevators, and ramps. All elevated signs posted in accordance with this division and division (C) of section 3781.111 of the Revised Code shall be mounted on a fixed or movable post, and the distance from the ground to the bottom edge of the sign shall measure not less than five feet. If a new sign or a replacement sign designating an accessible parking location is posted on or after October 14, 1999, there also shall be affixed upon the surface of that sign or affixed next to the designating sign a notice that states the fine applicable for the offense of parking a motor vehicle in the designated accessible parking location if the motor vehicle is not legally entitled to be parked in that location. (F)(1)(a) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle at accessible parking locations provided under division (E) of this section or at accessible clearly marked parking locations provided in or on privately owned parking lots, parking garages, or other parking areas and designated in accordance with that division, unless one of the following applies: (i) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and is displaying a valid removable windshield placard or accessible license plates; (ii) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability and is displaying a parking card or accessible license plates. (b) Any motor vehicle that is parked in an accessible marked parking location in violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section may be towed or otherwise removed from the parking location by the law enforcement agency of the political subdivision in which the parking location is located. A motor vehicle that is so towed or removed shall not be released to its owner until the owner presents proof of ownership of the motor vehicle and pays all towing and storage fees normally imposed by that political subdivision for towing and storing motor vehicles. If the motor vehicle is a leased vehicle, it shall not be released to the lessee until the lessee presents proof that that person is the lessee of the motor vehicle and pays all towing and storage fees normally imposed by that political subdivision for towing and storing motor vehicles. (c) If a person is charged with a violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section, it is an affirmative defense to the charge that the person suffered an injury not more than seventy-two hours prior to the time the person was issued the ticket or citation and that, because of the injury, the person meets at least one of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. (2) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle in an area that is commonly known as an access aisle, which area is marked by diagonal stripes and is located immediately adjacent to an accessible parking location provided under division (E) of this section or at an accessible clearly marked parking location provided in or on a privately owned parking lot, parking garage, or other parking area and designated in accordance with that division. (G) When a motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and is displaying a removable windshield placard or accessible license plates, or when a motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability and is displaying a parking card or accessible license plates, the motor vehicle is permitted to park for a period of two hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities, except where local ordinances or police rules provide otherwise or where the vehicle is parked in such a manner as to be clearly a traffic hazard. (H) No owner of an office, facility, or parking garage where accessible parking locations are required to be designated in accordance with division (E) of this section shall fail to properly mark the accessible parking locations in accordance with that division or fail to maintain the markings of the accessible locations, including the erection and maintenance of the fixed or movable signs. (I) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person or organization to apply for a removable windshield placard or accessible license plates if the parking card or accessible license plates issued to the person or organization under prior law have not expired or been surrendered or revoked. (J)(1) Whoever violates division (A) or (C) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (2)(a) Whoever violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in division (J)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(2)(a) of this section, an offender who violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty nor more than five hundred dollars. An offender who violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars if the offender, prior to sentencing, proves either of the following to the satisfaction of the court: (i) At the time of the violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) of this section, the offender or the person for whose transport the motor vehicle was being operated had been issued a removable windshield placard that then was valid or accessible license plates that then were valid but the offender or the person neglected to display the placard or license plates as described in division (F)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (ii) At the time of the violation of division (F)(1)(a)(ii) of this section, the offender or the person for whose transport the motor vehicle was being operated had been issued a parking card that then was valid or accessible license plates that then were valid but the offender or the person neglected to display the card or license plates as described in division (F)(1)(a)(ii) of this section. (b) In no case shall an offender who violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section be sentenced to any term of imprisonment. An arrest or conviction for a violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section does not constitute a criminal record and need not be reported by the person so arrested or convicted in response to any inquiries contained in any application for employment, license, or other right or privilege, or made in connection with the person's appearance as a witness. The clerk of the court shall pay every fine collected under divisions (J)(2) and (3) of this section to the political subdivision in which the violation occurred. Except as provided in division (J)(2) of this section, the political subdivision shall use the fine moneys it receives under divisions (J)(2) and (3) of this section to pay the expenses it incurs in complying with the signage and notice requirements contained in division (E) of this section. The political subdivision may use up to fifty per cent of each fine it receives under divisions (J)(2) and (3) of this section to pay the costs of educational, advocacy, support, and assistive technology programs for persons with disabilities, and for public improvements within the political subdivision that benefit or assist persons with disabilities, if governmental agencies or nonprofit organizations offer the programs. (3) Whoever violates division (F)(2) of this section shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty nor more than five hundred dollars. In no case shall an offender who violates division (F)(2) of this section be sentenced to any term of imprisonment. An arrest or conviction for a violation of division (F)(2) of this section does not constitute a criminal record and need not be reported by the person so arrested or convicted in response to any inquiries contained in any application for employment, license, or other right or privilege, or made in connection with the person's appearance as a witness. (4) Whoever violates division (H) of this section shall be punished as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(4) of this section, the offender shall be issued a warning. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (H) of this section or of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that division, the offender shall not be issued a warning but shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each parking location that is not properly marked or whose markings are not properly maintained. (K) As used in this section: (1) "Person with a disability" means any person who has lost the use of one or both legs or one or both arms, who is blind, deaf, or unable to move without the aid of crutches or a wheelchair, or whose mobility is restricted by a permanent cardiovascular, pulmonary, or other disabling condition. (2) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk" has the same meaning as in section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. (3) "Accessible license plates" and "removable windshield placard" mean any license plates, standard removable windshield placard, permanent removable windshield placard, or temporary removable windshield placard issued under section 4503.41 or 4503.44 of the Revised Code, and also mean any substantially similar license plates or removable windshield placard issued by a state, district, country, or sovereignty. Sec. 4511.691. (A) As used in sections 4511.691 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code: (1) "Access aisle" means the area marked by diagonal stripes located immediately adjacent to an accessible parking space that is provided under this section or at a clearly marked accessible parking space provided in a privately owned parking area. (2) "Accessible license plate" means any license plate issued under sections 4503.41 and 4503.441 of the Revised Code, and includes any substantially similar license plate issued by another state, district, country, or sovereignty. (3) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk" and "organization" have the same meanings as in section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. (4) "Public accommodation" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 12181. (5) "Removable windshield placard" means any placard issued under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code, and includes any substantially similar removable windshield placard issued by another state, district, country, or sovereignty. (6) "Required entity" means all of the following: (a) A political subdivision; (b) The state and all agencies and instrumentalities thereof; (c) The owner of a place of public accommodation. (B)(1) A required entity shall provide and designate special parking locations and privileges for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk, also known as accessible parking spaces or disability parking spaces. (2) The required entity shall make accessible parking spaces available at all offices, facilities, and places, where parking is provided, whether owned, rented, or leased by the entity. (3) The required entity shall ensure that the accessible parking spaces are reasonably close to exits, entrances, elevators, and ramps and are in compliance with the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq. (C)(1) A required entity shall designate the accessible parking spaces by posting an elevated sign, whether permanently affixed or movable, imprinted with the international symbol of access. (2) The required entity shall post or mount the elevated sign on a fixed or movable post so that the distance from the ground to the bottom edge of the sign is not less than five feet. (3) The required entity shall affix upon the surface of the sign or next to the sign a notice that states the fine applicable for the offense of parking a motor vehicle in the accessible parking space if the motor vehicle is not legally entitled to be parked in that location. (D) No required entity shall fail to do any of the following: (1) Properly designate the accessible parking locations in accordance with division (C) of this section; (2) Maintain the markings of the accessible parking locations, including the erection and maintenance of the fixed or movable signs; (3) Maintain access to the accessible parking spaces, access aisle, curb cuts, or other features designed to provide accessibility for a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk. (E) In order to maintain access as required under division (D)(3) of this section, a required entity may do either of the following: (1) Remove any unreasonable obstruction of an accessible parking space, access aisle, or curb cut. If the obstruction is the result of an adverse weather event, the required entity shall remove the obstruction not later than twenty-four hours after the conclusion of that event; (2) Provide suitable alternative parking spots, access aisle space, or access points similar to a curb cut if the obstruction cannot be removed. (F)(1) Whoever violates this section shall be issued a warning for a first violation. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, or of a substantially similar municipal ordinance, the offender shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each parking location that is not properly marked or properly maintained. (2) Fines collected under this section shall be deposited into the accessible parking violations fund created in section 4511.693 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.692. (A) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle at an accessible parking space designated by a required entity under section 4511.691 of the Revised Code or at a clearly marked accessible parking space provided in a privately owned parking area, unless both of the following apply: (1) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk. (2) The motor vehicle is displaying a valid accessible license plate or removable windshield placard issued to either the person or organization operating the motor vehicle or the person being transported by the motor vehicle. (B)(1) Any motor vehicle that is parked in an accessible parking space in violation of division (A) of this section may be towed or otherwise removed from the parking space by either of the following: (a) The law enforcement agency of the political subdivision in which the parking space is located; (b) The owner of the parking area in which the parking space is located. (2) A motor vehicle that is so towed or removed shall not be released to its owner until the owner presents proof of ownership of the motor vehicle and pays all towing and storage fees normally imposed for towing and storing motor vehicles. If the motor vehicle is a leased vehicle, it shall not be released to the lessee until the lessee presents proof that that person is the lessee of the motor vehicle and pays all towing and storage fees normally imposed for towing and storing motor vehicles. (3) If a person is charged with a violation of division (A) of this section, it is not a defense to the charge that the sign posted does not comply with the technical requirements of section 4511.691 of the Revised Code, if a reasonable person would know that the parking space is reserved for a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk. (C) No person shall park in an accessible parking space when the person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk will either: (1) Be dropped off and picked up at the entrance to the place of public accommodation; (2) Will not be entering or exiting the motor vehicle while it is parked. (D) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle in any part of an access aisle, including a person that has been issued an accessible license plate or a removable windshield placard. (E) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle in front of a ramp, curb cut, access entrance, or accessible route, including a person that has been issued an accessible license plate or a removable windshield placard. (F)(1) When a motor vehicle is being operated by or for the transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and is displaying either an accessible license plate or a removable windshield placard, the operator is permitted to park that motor vehicle for a period of two hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities. (2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not apply when local ordinances or police rules provide otherwise or when the motor vehicle is parked in such a manner as to be clearly a traffic hazard. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, whoever violates division (A), (C), (D), or (E) of this section is subject to the following civil penalties: (a) For a first offense, two hundred fifty dollars; (b) For a second offense, not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars; (c) For a third or subsequent offense, not less than five hundred nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars. (2) Whoever violates division (A) of this section shall not be fined under division (G)(1) of this section if the offender, within thirty days of receiving the ticket in the mail, proves that either the offender or the person being transported by the offender, at the time of the violation, had a valid accessible license plate or removable windshield placard but the offender neglected to display the valid or the correct license plate or placard. (H)(1) Tickets issued for a civil violation of division (A), (C), (D), or (E) of this section shall be issued in accordance with sections 4511.695 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code. (2) The clerk of court or violations clerk of the parking violations bureau shall report all convictions for a violation of division (A), (C), (D), or (E) of this section to the registrar of motor vehicles. (I)(1) The clerk of court or violations clerk of the parking violations bureau shall pay fifty per cent of every fine collected under division (G) of this section to the political subdivision in which the violation occurred. (2) The remaining fifty per cent of every fine collected under division (G) of this section shall be paid into the accessible parking violations fund established by section 4511.693 of the Revised Code. (J) Whoever knowingly violates division (D) of this section when that violation prevents a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk from being able to enter or exit the motor vehicle transporting that person is guilty of unlawful restraint of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, a misdemeanor of the third degree. Sec. 4511.693. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the accessible parking violations fund. The fund shall consist of the fines required to be deposited in the fund under sections 4503.445, 4503.446, 4511.691, and 4511.692 of the Revised Code. The fund shall be administered by the director of public safety and the director of education and workforce. (B) The money in the fund shall be divided as follows: (1) Twenty-five per cent shall be used by the director of public safety to administer the volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program created in section 4511.694 of the Revised Code, to collect data related to accessible parking violations, and to assist local law enforcement in enforcing the accessible parking laws. (2) Seventy-five per cent shall be used by the director of education and workforce to provide grants to a nonprofit corporation that creates, expands, and oversees interscholastic adaptive sports specifically for youth with physical disabilities. The director shall approve the nonprofit corporation that receives such grants and the amounts paid through the grants. (C) The director of education and workforce shall provide a report to the general assembly by the thirty-first day of December of each year, which shall include the following information: (1) A description of the entity that received a grant from the fund that year and how much money the entity received; (2) A description of activities carried out using the grant provided to the entity under this section; (3) Information regarding the goals and objectives achieved by the entity through the activities carried out using the grant provided to the entity under this section. (D) All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 4511.694. (A) The director of public safety shall establish a volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program. The purpose of the program is to train a volunteer accessible parking enforcement force, which shall assist local law enforcement in enforcing the accessible parking laws. Volunteers trained under the program may submit photographic evidence to law enforcement for violations of the accessible parking laws that are enforced under sections 4511.695 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, but will have no enforcement authority. (B) To serve as a member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force, a person must meet all of the following qualifications: (1) Be at least twenty-one years of age; (2) Have no prior felony convictions; (3) Successfully complete the volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program. (C) The volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program shall include instruction in general administrative rules and procedures governing the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force, the role of the judicial system as it relates to parking regulation and enforcement, proper techniques and methods relating to recording violations of parking laws, human interaction skills, personal safety and ethics relating to the recording of violations of parking laws, and first aid. (D) A law enforcement agency may utilize the photographic evidence taken by a member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force to assist the agency in enforcing civil accessible parking violations under sections 4511.695 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (E) A member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force shall only take photographic evidence of accessible parking violations in accordance with sections 4511.695 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (F) Any member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force assumes all liability for participation in the training program and volunteer work with the law enforcement agency. The member shall hold harmless the state, the department of public safety, any political subdivision, and the law enforcement agency for any claims resulting from the volunteer work performed by the member. The director shall provide hold harmless forms necessary for the implementation of division (F) of this section, which shall be signed by the member and submitted to the department and the applicable law enforcement agency. (G)(1) The director shall track the number of persons trained through the volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program and the expenses incurred by the department in administering the program. (2) The director shall adopt any rules necessary for establishing and administering the volunteer accessible parking enforcement training program. Sec. 4511.695. As used in sections 4511.695 to 4511.699 of the Revised Code: (A) "Designated party" means the person whom the registered owner of a motor vehicle, upon receipt of a ticket for an accessible parking law violation, identifies as the person who parked the vehicle of the registered owner at the time of the violation. (B) "Law enforcement officer" means a state highway patrol trooper, sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, police officer of a police department of any municipal corporation, police constable of any township, or police officer of a township or joint police district, who is employed on a permanent, full-time basis by a law enforcement agency. (C) "Member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force" means a person trained by the department of public safety under the program established by section 4511.694 of the Revised Code and utilized by a law enforcement agency to assist the agency in enforcing civil accessible parking law violations. (D) "Motor vehicle leasing dealer" has the same meaning as in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code. (E) "Motor vehicle renting dealer" has the same meaning as in section 4549.65 of the Revised Code. (F) "Registered owner" means any of the following: (1) Any person or entity identified by the bureau of motor vehicles or any other state motor vehicle registration bureau, department, or office as the owner of a motor vehicle; (2) The lessee of a motor vehicle under a lease of six months or longer; (3) The renter of a motor vehicle pursuant to a written rental agreement with a motor vehicle renting dealer. (G) "Ticket" means any parking ticket, citation, summons, or other ticket issued in response to an alleged accessible parking law violation that represents a civil violation. (H) "Accessible parking law violation" means a violation of division (A), (C), (D), or (E) of section 4511.692 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. Sec. 4511.696. (A) When a law enforcement officer witnesses an accessible parking law violation, the officer may issue a ticket for the violation. The ticket shall comply with the requirements of this section and section 4511.697 of the Revised Code. If issuing a ticket, the officer shall take at least one photo of the violation that captures the motor vehicle, the license plate, and that demonstrates an accessible parking law violation occurred. (B)(1) If the operator of the motor vehicle is present, the officer shall record on the ticket the name of the operator in the space provided for identification of the offender. The officer shall personally serve a copy of the ticket on the operator. (2) If the operator of the motor vehicle is not present or cannot be identified, the officer shall insert the word "owner" in the space provided for identification of the offender. The officer shall constructively serve a copy of the parking ticket on the owner of the motor vehicle by affixing the ticket to the motor vehicle in a conspicuous place. (C) When a member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force witnesses an accessible parking law violation, the member may take photos of the violation and submit the photos to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The member shall ensure that any photos capture the motor vehicle, the license plate, the location of the violation, and demonstrate that an accessible parking law violation occurred. The member shall submit the photos within twenty-four hours of the witnessed violation. No member shall issue tickets for an accessible parking law violation. (D) The original of any ticket issued in accordance with divisions (A) and (B) of this section and any photos of a violation taken in accordance with division (A) or (C) of this section shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency that employs the law enforcement officer or that utilizes the member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force. The law enforcement agency may use any lawful means to identify the registered owner of the motor vehicle if a copy of the ticket was left on the motor vehicle in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section or photos were taken in compliance with division (C) of this section. (E) After the identification of the registered owner under division (D) of this section, if applicable, and within thirty days of the accessible parking law violation, the law enforcement agency shall send by regular mail the ticket charging either the operator of the motor vehicle, if known, or the registered owner with the violation. The ticket shall include copies of the photos taken by the law enforcement officer or member of the volunteer accessible parking enforcement force. (F) A law enforcement agency that mails a ticket charging the operator or registered owner with the accessible parking law violation shall, without unnecessary delay, file a certified copy of the ticket with the municipal court, county court, or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction over the civil action. (G) A certified copy of the ticket alleging an accessible parking law violation is prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein and is admissible in a civil action or proceeding concerning the ticket issued under this section. Sec. 4511.697. A law enforcement agency shall ensure that a ticket for an accessible parking law violation issued under section 4511.696 of the Revised Code contains all of the following: (A) The name and address of the registered owner or the current operator of the motor vehicle, if known; (B) The letters and numerals appearing on the license plate issued to the motor vehicle; (C) The make and model of the motor vehicle; (D) The date, time, and place of the violation; (E) The accessible parking law violation charged; (F) The amount of the civil penalty imposed, the date by which the civil penalty is required to be paid, and the address of the municipal court, county court, or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction over the civil action to which the payment is to be sent; (G) A statement signed by a law enforcement officer indicating that the motor vehicle was involved in an accessible parking law violation and the ticket is prima facie evidence of that accessible parking law violation; (H) Information advising the person or entity alleged to be liable for the violation of the options prescribed in section 4511.698 of the Revised Code. The law enforcement agency shall include with the information the time, place, and manner in which the person or entity may appear in court or at the parking violations bureau to contest the violation and ticket and the procedure for disclaiming liability by submitting an affidavit to the municipal court, county court, or parking violations bureau as prescribed in section 4511.698 of the Revised Code. (I) A warning that failure to exercise one of the options prescribed in section 4511.698 of the Revised Code is deemed to be an admission of liability and waiver of the opportunity to contest the violation. Sec. 4511.698. A person or entity who receives a ticket for a civil violation under section 4511.696 of the Revised Code shall elect to do one of the following: (A) In accordance with instructions on the ticket, pay the civil penalty, thereby admitting liability and waiving the opportunity to contest the violation. (B)(1) Within thirty days after receipt of the ticket by mail, provide the municipal court, county court, or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction over the civil action with any of the following affidavits: (a) If the accessible parking law violation charged is a violation of division (A) of section 4511.692 of the Revised Code, an affidavit executed by the operator of the motor vehicle or registered owner stating that either the owner, the operator, or the person being transported in the motor vehicle, at the time of the violation, had a valid accessible license plate or removable windshield placard but the owner or operator neglected to display the valid or the correct license plate or placard. (b) An affidavit executed by the registered owner stating that another person was operating and parked the motor vehicle of the registered owner at the time of the violation, identifying that person as a designated party who may be held liable for the violation, and containing at a minimum the name and address of the designated party. (c) An affidavit executed by the registered owner stating that at the time of the violation, the motor vehicle or the license plate issued to the motor vehicle was stolen and therefore was in the care, custody, or control of some person or entity to whom the registered owner did not grant permission to use the motor vehicle. To demonstrate that the motor vehicle or the license plate was stolen prior to the accessible parking law violation and therefore was not under the control or possession of the registered owner at the time of the violation, the registered owner shall submit proof that a report about the stolen motor vehicle or license plate was filed with the appropriate law enforcement agency prior to the violation or within forty-eight hours after the violation occurred. (2) The operator of the motor vehicle or the registered owner is not responsible for an accessible parking law violation if, within thirty days after receipt of the ticket by mail, the operator or registered owner furnishes an affidavit specified in division (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, as applicable, to the court or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction in a form established by the court or bureau and the following conditions are met: (a) If the operator of the motor vehicle or the registered owner submits an affidavit as specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, the affidavit is supported by evidence of the valid or correct accessible license plate or removable windshield placard. (b) If the registered owner submits an affidavit as specified in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, the designated party either accepts liability for the violation by paying the civil penalty or by failing to request a court or parking violations bureau hearing within thirty days or is determined liable in a hearing. (c) If the registered owner submits an affidavit as specified in division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the affidavit is supported by a stolen vehicle or stolen license plate report as required in that division. (C) If the registered owner is a motor vehicle leasing dealer or a motor vehicle renting dealer, notify the court or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction of the name and address of the lessee or renter of the motor vehicle at the time of the accessible parking law violation. The court or bureau shall establish the form of the notice. A motor vehicle leasing dealer or motor vehicle renting dealer who receives a ticket for an alleged accessible parking law violation is not liable for a ticket issued for a motor vehicle that was in the care, custody, or control of a lessee or renter at the time of the alleged violation. The dealer shall not pay such a ticket and subsequently attempt to collect a fee or assess the lessee or renter a charge for any payment of such a ticket made on behalf of the lessee or renter. (D) If the motor vehicle involved in the accessible parking law violation is a commercial motor vehicle and the ticket is issued to a corporate entity, provide to the court or parking violations bureau with jurisdiction an affidavit in a form established by the court or bureau, sworn to or affirmed by an agent of the corporate entity, that provides the name and address of the employee who was operating and parked the motor vehicle at the time of the alleged violation and who is the designated party. (E) Contest the ticket by filing a written request for a court or parking violations bureau hearing to review the ticket in a form established by the court or bureau. The person shall file the written request not later than thirty days after receipt of the ticket by mail. The failure to request a hearing within this time period constitutes a waiver of the right to contest the violation and ticket, and is deemed to constitute an admission of liability. Sec. 4511.699. (A)(1) A court or a parking violations bureau with jurisdiction that receives an affidavit described in division (B)(1)(b) or (D) of section 4511.698 of the Revised Code or a notification under division (C) of that section from a registered owner may proceed to notify the law enforcement agency to send a ticket that conforms with this section and section 4511.697 of the Revised Code to the designated party. (2) The law enforcement agency shall send the conforming ticket to the designated party by ordinary mail not later than twenty-one days after receipt of the notification from the court or parking violations bureau. (B)(1) If a hearing is requested under division (E) of section 4511.698 of the Revised Code, the court or bureau shall issue a written decision imposing liability for the violation upon an individual if the court or bureau finds by a preponderance of the evidence that: (a) The alleged accessible parking law violation did in fact occur; (b) The person named in the original or any subsequent ticket is the person who was operating and parked the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. The court or bureau shall submit the decision to the law enforcement agency and the person named in the ticket. (2) If the court or bureau finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the alleged accessible parking law violation did not occur or did in fact occur but the person named in the original or any subsequent ticket is not the person who was operating and parked the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the court or bureau shall issue a written decision finding that the individual is not liable for the violation and submit it to the law enforcement agency and the person named in the ticket. (3) If the person who requested the court hearing fails to appear, the court or bureau shall determine that the person is liable for the violation. In such a case, the court or bureau shall issue a written decision imposing liability for the violation upon the individual and submit it to the law enforcement agency and the person named in the ticket. (4) The court or bureau shall render a decision on the day a hearing takes place. (C) The court or bureau shall charge the applicable costs and fees for the civil action to the party that does not prevail in the action. Sec. 4517.12. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles shall deny the application of any person for a license as a motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle leasing dealer, or motor vehicle auction owner and refuse to issue the license if the registrar finds that the applicant: (1) Has made any false statement of a material fact in the application; (2) Has not complied with sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (3) Is of bad business repute or has habitually defaulted on financial obligations; (4) Is engaged or will engage in the business of selling at retail any new motor vehicles without having written authority from the manufacturer or distributor thereof to sell new motor vehicles and to perform repairs under the terms of the manufacturer's or distributor's new motor vehicle warranty, except as provided in division (C) of this section and except that a person who assembles or installs special equipment or accessories for persons with disabilitiesa person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, as defined in section 4503.44 of the Revised Code, upon a motor vehicle chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor shall not be denied a license pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section; (5) Has been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code; (6) Has entered into or is about to enter into a contract or agreement with a manufacturer or distributor of motor vehicles that is contrary to sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (7) Is insolvent; (8) Is of insufficient responsibility to ensure the prompt payment of any final judgments that might reasonably be entered against the applicant because of the transaction of business as a motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle leasing dealer, or motor vehicle auction owner during the period of the license applied for, or has failed to satisfy any such judgment; (9) Has no established place of business that, where applicable, is used or will be used for the purpose of selling, displaying, offering for sale, dealing in, or leasing motor vehicles at the location for which application is made; (10) Has, less than twelve months prior to making application, been denied a motor vehicle dealer's, motor vehicle leasing dealer's, or motor vehicle auction owner's license, or has any such license revoked; (11) Is a manufacturer, or a parent company, subsidiary, or affiliated entity of a manufacturer, applying for a license to sell or lease new or used motor vehicles at retail. Division (A)(11) of this section shall not serve as a basis for the termination, revocation, or nonrenewal of a license granted prior to September 4, 2014. Nothing in division (A)(11) of this section shall prohibit a manufacturer from doing either of the following: (a) Owning, operating, or controlling not more than three licensed motor vehicle dealerships if, as of January 1, 2014, the manufacturer was selling or otherwise distributing its motor vehicles at an established place of business in this state. Such ownership, operation, or control may continue unless the manufacturer's motor vehicle operations are sold or acquired or the manufacturer produces any motor vehicles other than all-electric motor vehicles. (b) Disposing of motor vehicles at wholesale at the termination of a consumer lease through a motor vehicle auction. (B) If the applicant is a corporation or partnership, the registrar may refuse to issue a license if any officer, director, or partner of the applicant has been guilty of any act or omission that would be cause for refusing or revoking a license issued to such officer, director, or partner as an individual. The registrar's finding may be based upon facts contained in the application or upon any other information the registrar may have. Immediately upon denying an application for any of the reasons in this section, the registrar shall enter a final order together with the registrar's findings and certify the same to the motor vehicle dealers' and salespersons' licensing board. (C) Notwithstanding division (A)(4) of this section, the registrar shall not deny the application of any person and refuse to issue a license if the registrar finds that the applicant is engaged or will engage in the business of selling at retail any new motor vehicles and demonstrates all of the following in the form prescribed by the registrar: (1) That the applicant has posted a bond, surety, or certificate of deposit with the registrar in an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars for the protection and benefit of the applicant's customers except that a new motor vehicle dealer who is not exclusively engaged in the business of selling remanufactured vehicles shall not be required to post the bond, surety, or certificate of deposit otherwise required by division (C)(1) of this section; (2) That, at the time of the sale of the vehicle, each customer of the applicant will be furnished with a warranty issued by the remanufacturer for a term of at least one year; (3) That the applicant provides and maintains at the applicant's location and place of business a permanent facility with all of the following: (a) A showroom with space, under roof, for the display of at least one new motor vehicle; (b) A service and parts facility for remanufactured vehicles; (c) Full-time service and parts personnel with the proper training and technical expertise to service the remanufactured vehicles sold by the applicant. Sec. 4521.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Parking infraction" means a violation of any ordinance, resolution, or regulation enacted by a local authority that regulates the standing or parking of vehicles and that is authorized pursuant to section 505.17 or 4511.07 of the Revised Code, or a violation of any ordinance, resolution, or regulation enacted by a local authority as authorized by this chapter, if the local authority in either of these cases also has enacted an ordinance, resolution, or regulation of the type described in division (A) of section 4521.02 of the Revised Code in relation to the particular regulatory ordinance, resolution, or regulation. (B) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Court" means a municipal court, county court, juvenile court, or mayor's court, unless specifically identified as one of these courts, in which case it means the specifically identified court. (D) "Local authority" means every county, municipal corporation, township, or other local board or body having authority to adopt police regulations pursuant to the constitution and laws of this state. (E) "Accessible parking space" means a motor vehicle parking location that is reserved for the exclusive standing or parking of a vehicle that is operated by or on behalf of a person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and displays a placard or an accessible license plates plate issued under section 4503.44 4503.41 or 4503.441 of the Revised Code, a removable windshield placard issued under section 4503.442 of the Revised Code, or any substantially similar accessible license plate or removable windshield placard issued by another state, district, country, or sovereignty. (F) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk" has the same meaning as in section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4521.02. (A) A local authority that enacts any ordinance, resolution, or regulation that regulates the standing or parking of vehicles and that is authorized pursuant to section 505.17 or 4511.07 of the Revised Code also by ordinance, resolution, or regulation may specify that a violation of the regulatory ordinance, resolution, or regulation shall not be considered a criminal offense for any purpose, that a person who commits the violation shall not be arrested as a result of the commission of the violation, and that the violation shall be handled pursuant to this chapter. If such a specification is made, the local authority also by ordinance, resolution, or regulation shall adopt a fine for a violation of the regulatory ordinance, resolution, or regulation and prescribe an additional penalty or penalties for failure to answer any charges of the violation in a timely manner. In no case shall any fine adopted or additional penalty prescribed pursuant to this division exceed the fine established by the municipal or county court having territorial jurisdiction over the entire or a majority of the political subdivision of the local authority, in its schedule of fines established pursuant to Traffic Rule 13(C), for a substantively comparable violation. Except as provided in this division, in no case shall any fine adopted or additional penalty prescribed pursuant to this division exceed one hundred dollars, plus costs and other administrative charges, per violation. If a local authority chooses to adopt a specific fine for a violation of an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that regulates the standing or parking of a vehicle in an accessible parking space, the fine the local authority establishes for such offense shall be an amount not less than two hundred fifty dollars but not more than five seven hundred fifty dollars. (B) A local authority that enacts an ordinance, resolution, or regulation pursuant to division (A) of this section also may enact an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that provides for the impoundment or immobilization of vehicles found standing or parked in violation of the regulatory ordinance, resolution, or regulation and the release of the vehicles to their owners. In no case shall an ordinance, resolution, or regulation require the owner of the vehicle to post bond or deposit cash in excess of one thousand dollars in order to obtain release of the vehicle. (C) A local authority that enacts any ordinance, resolution, or regulation pursuant to division (A) of this section also shall enact an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that specifies the time within which a person who is issued a parking ticket must answer in relation to the parking infraction charged in the ticket. Sec. 4731.481. No physician shall do either any of the following: (A) Furnish a person with a prescription in order Complete the accessible parking certification form to enable the a person to be issued an accessible license plate, a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, or license plates under either section 4503.44 4503.441 or 4503.442 of the Revised Code, knowing that the person does not meet any of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) (A) of that section 4503.44 of the Revised Code; (B) Furnish a person with a prescription Complete the accessible parking certification form described in division (A) of this section and knowingly misstate on the prescription form the length of time the physician expects the person to have the disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk in order to enable the person to retain a removable windshield placard issued under section 4503.44 4503.442 of the Revised Code for a period of time longer than that which would be estimated by a similar practitioner under the same or similar circumstances; (C) Fail to retain information sufficient to substantiate that the person is eligible for accessible parking privileges. Sec. 4734.161. No chiropractor shall do either any of the following: (A) Furnish a person with a prescription in order Complete the accessible parking certification form to enable the a person to be issued an accessible license plate, a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, or license plates under either section 4503.44 4503.441 or 4503.442 of the Revised Code, knowing that the person does not meet any of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) (A) of that section 4503.44 of the Revised Code; (B) Furnish a person with a prescription Complete the accessible parking certification form described in division (A) of this section and knowingly misstate on the prescription form the length of time the chiropractor expects the person to have the disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk in order to enable the person to retain a removable windshield placard issued under section 4503.44 4503.442 of the Revised Code for a period of time longer than that which would be estimated by a similar practitioner under the same or similar circumstances; (C) Fail to retain information sufficient to substantiate that the person is eligible for accessible parking privileges. Section 2. That existing sections 311.30, 505.541, 509.04, 3501.29, 3781.111, 4503.038, 4503.10, 4503.12, 4503.41, 4503.44, 4511.69, 4517.12, 4521.01, 4521.02, 4731.481, and 4734.161 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3501.29 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 281 and H.B. 458 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 4503.44 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 and H.B. 195 of the 135th General Assembly.